Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-414
Depository contracts; standards; establish.

The Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse may enter into depository contracts with any municipal or county public library, state college or state university library, and out-of-state research libraries. The requirements for eligibility to contract as a depository library shall be established by the Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse. The standards shall include and take into consideration the type of library, ability to preserve such publications and to make them available for public use, and also such geographical locations as will make the publications conveniently accessible to residents in all areas of the state.

Laws 1972, LB 1284, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 250, § 23.